Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1845
Victim and
witness assistance center; selection and establishment; Nebraska Commission
on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice; duties; funding.

(1) Any public or private nonprofit agency may apply to the Nebraska
Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice for selection and funding
as a victim and witness assistance center pursuant to sections 81-1843 to
81-1851.

(2) The commission shall consider the following factors,
together with any other factors it deems appropriate, in selecting applicants
to receive funds and be designated as a victim and witness assistance center:

(a) The number of volunteers that the proposed center will
utilize;

(b) The stated goals of the applicant;

(c) The potential number of people that may be served by
the proposed center and the needs of the community for such a center;

(d) Evidence of community support for the establishment of
the proposed center; and

(e) The organizational structure of the agency which will
operate the proposed center and provide services to victims and witnesses
of crimes.

(3) Upon evaluation of all applicants, the Nebraska Commission
on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice shall select a number of public or
private nonprofit agencies which the commission deems qualified for designation
to receive funding for the establishment and operation of such centers.

(4) The commission shall, upon the establishment of such
centers, conduct appraisals of their performance to determine which of the
centers shall receive continuation grants.

Laws 1981, LB 477, § 3;

Laws 2004, LB 270, § 10;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 209;

Laws 2013, LB222, § 38.